Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Subchapter 3. Form and Nature of Bonds and Notes

§ 5031.
Bonds and notes.

The Authority may issue its negotiable notes and bonds in such principal amount as the Authority determines to be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving any of its corporate purposes, including the payment of interest on notes and bonds of the Authority, establishment of reserves to secure the notes and bonds, and all other expenditures of the Authority incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and powers. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, such bonds and notes may be issued for project costs, or the Authority’s share of costs of projects, which may include:
(a) (1) The Authority may issue its negotiable notes and bonds in such principal amount as the Authority determines to be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving any of its corporate purposes, including the payment of interest on notes and bonds of the Authority, establishment of reserves to secure the notes and bonds, and all other expenditures of the Authority incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and powers. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, such bonds and notes may be issued for project costs, or the Authority’s share of costs of projects, which may include:

interest prior to and during the carrying out of any project and for a reasonable period thereafter;

prepayments under contracts for the purchase of capacity and output;

reserves for debt service or other capital or current expenses as may be required by a trust agreement or resolution securing bonds and notes; and

all other expenses incidental to the determination of the feasibility of any project or to carrying out the project or to placing the project in operation.

The Authority shall have the power, from time to time, to issue notes, to renew notes and bonds, to pay notes, including the interest on them and, whenever it deems refunding expedient, to refund any bonds by the issuance of new bonds, whether the bonds to be refunded have or have not matured, and to issue bonds partly to refund bonds then outstanding and partly for any of its corporate purposes.

Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by resolution of the Authority, every issue of its notes and bonds shall be general obligations of the Authority payable out of any revenues or monies of the Authority, subject only to any agreements with the holders of particular notes or bonds pledging any particular revenues.

Bonds and notes may be issued in accordance with this chapter, without the need to obtain the consent and approval of the Public Utility Commission as provided in this title.

The notes and bonds shall be authorized by resolution or resolutions of the Authority, shall bear such date or dates, and shall mature at such time or times as the resolution or resolutions may provide. The bonds may be issued as serial bonds payable in annual installments or as term bonds or as a combination of them. The resolution or resolutions may provide that the notes and bonds bear interest at a given rate or rates, be in certain denominations, be in temporary, coupon, or registered form, carry certain registration privileges, be executed in a given manner, be payable in a given medium of payment, at a place or places within or outside the State, and be subject to specified terms of redemption. The Authority may participate in any state or federally created or supported bond programs. The notes and bonds of the Authority may be sold by the Authority, at public or private sale, at such price or prices as the Authority shall determine.

Any resolution or resolutions authorizing any notes or bonds or any issue of them may contain provisions, which shall be a part of the contract or contracts with the bond or noteholders as to:

pledging, mortgaging, or granting a security interest in any real or personal property and all or any part of the revenues of the Authority, of any project, or any revenue producing contract made by the Authority with any person to secure the payment of the notes or bonds or of any issue of them subject to such agreements with noteholders or bondholders as may then exist;

the custody, collection securing, investment, and payment of any revenues, assets, money, funds, or property with respect to which the Authority may have any rights or interest;

the rates or charges for electric energy sold by, or services rendered by, the Authority, the amount to be raised by the rates or charges, and the use and disposition of any or all revenue;

the setting aside of reserves or sinking funds and their regulation and disposition;

limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of notes or bonds may be applied and pledging the proceeds to secure the payment of the notes or bonds or of any issue of them;

limitations on the issuance of additional notes or bonds; the terms upon which additional notes or bonds may be issued and secured; and the refunding of outstanding or other notes or bonds;

the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with noteholders or bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of notes or bonds the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which consent may be given;

vesting in a trustee or trustees, within or outside the State, such property, rights, powers, and duties in trust as the Authority may determine, which may include any or all of the rights, powers, and duties of the trustee appointed by the bondholders pursuant to this chapter and limiting or abrogating the right of the bondholders to appoint a trustee under this chapter or limiting the rights, powers, and duties of the trustee;

defining the acts or omissions to act which shall constitute a default in the obligations and duties of the Authority to the holders of the notes or bonds and providing for the rights and remedies of the holders of the notes or bonds in the event of such default, including as a matter of right the appointment of a receiver; provided, however, that the rights and remedies shall not be inconsistent with the general laws of the State and other provisions of this chapter; and

any other matters, of like or different character, which in any way affect the security or protection of the holders of the notes or bonds.

Any pledge made by the Authority shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; the revenues, monies, or property so pledged and thereafter received by the Authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery of it or further act. That pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the Authority, irrespective of whether those parties have notice of it.

Neither the directors nor executive officers of the Authority nor any other person executing the notes or bonds shall be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance of the notes or bonds.

The Authority, subject to whatever agreement with noteholders or bondholders as may then exist, shall have power out of any funds available for that purpose to purchase notes or bonds of the Authority, which shall then be cancelled, at a price not exceeding:

if the notes or bonds are then redeemable, the redemption price then applicable plus accrued interest to the next interest payment on them; or

if the notes or bonds are not then redeemable, the redemption price applicable on the first date after the purchase upon which the notes or bonds become subject to redemption plus accrued interest to that date.

In the discretion of the Authority, the notes or bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the Authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the power of a trust company within or outside the State. The trust indenture may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the noteholders or bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the Authority in relation to the exercise of its corporate powers and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all monies. The Authority may provide by the trust indenture for the payment of the proceeds of the notes or bonds and the revenues to the trustee under the trust indenture or other depository, and for the method of disbursement, with such safeguards and restrictions as it may determine. All expenses incurred in carrying out the trust indenture may be treated as a part of the operating expenses of the Authority. If the notes or bonds shall be secured by a trust indenture, the noteholders and bondholders shall have no authority to appoint a separate trustee to represent them.

Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, a bond or note issued under this chapter is fully negotiable for all purposes of 9A V.S.A. § 1—101 et seq., and each holder or owner of a bond or note, or of any coupon appurtenant to a bond or note, by accepting the bond or note or coupon shall be conclusively deemed to have agreed that the bond, note, or coupon is fully negotiable for those purposes.

Any provision of this chapter or of any other law or any recitals in any bonds or notes issued under this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, all bonds, notes, and interest coupons appertaining to them issued by the Authority shall have and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents, including negotiability, of investment securities under 9A V.S.A. § 1—101 et seq., but no provision of those sections respecting the filing of a financing statement to perfect a security interest shall be applicable to any pledge made or security interest created in connection with the issuance of the bonds, notes, or coupons.

In the case any of the directors or executive officers of the Authority whose signatures appear on any notes or bonds or coupons shall cease to be directors or executive officers before the delivery of such notes or bonds, the signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if those directors or executive officers had remained in office until that delivery.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3; amended

2009, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 42, eff. April 15, 2010;

2019, No. 81

, § 3.

§ 5032.
Refunding obligations; issuance.

The Authority may provide for the issuance of refunding obligations for the purpose of refunding any obligations then outstanding which have been issued under the provisions of this chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium on them and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of those obligations and for any corporate purpose of the Authority.
The issuance of the obligations, the maturities and other details pertaining to them, the rights of their holders, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the Authority in respect to them shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter which relate to the issuance of obligations, insofar as those provisions may be appropriate.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3.

§ 5033.
Refunding obligations; sale.

Refunding obligations issued as provided in section 5032 of this title may be sold or exchanged for outstanding obligations issued under this chapter and, if sold, the proceeds from them may be applied, in addition to any other authorized purposes, to the purchase, redemption, or payment of those outstanding obligations.
Pending the application of the proceeds of any refunding obligations, with any other available funds, to the payment of the principal, accrued interest, and any redemption premium on the obligations being refunded, and, if so provided or permitted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such refunding obligations or in the trust agreement securing them to the payment of any interest on refunding obligations and any expenses in connection with refunding, such proceeds may be invested as specified in the resolution authorizing the obligations to be refunded or the trust agreement securing them.
These investments shall mature or shall be subject to redemption by their holders, at the option of the holders, not later than the respective dates when the proceeds, together with the interest accruing on them, will be required for the purposes intended.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3.

§ 5034.
Remedies of bondholders and noteholders.

In the event that the Authority defaults in the payment of principal or of interest on any bonds or notes issued under this chapter after they become due, whether at maturity or upon call for redemption, and the default continues for a period of 30 days, or in the event that the Authority fails or refuses to comply with the provisions of this chapter, or defaults in any agreement made with the holders of an issue of bonds or notes of the Authority, the holders of 25 percent in aggregate principal amount of the bonds or notes of such issue then outstanding, by instrument or instruments filed in the office of the Secretary of State and proved or acknowledged in the same manner as a deed to be recorded, may appoint a trustee to represent the holders of those bonds or notes for the purposes herein provided.

That trustee may, and upon written request of the holders of 25 percent in principal amount of the bonds or notes then outstanding shall, in his or her or its own name:

enforce all rights of the bondholders or noteholders, including the right to require the Authority to fix and collect rates, fees, and charges relating to projects or other obligations held by it adequate to carry out any agreement as to, or pledge of, the revenues of the Authority, and to require the Authority to carry out any other agreements with the holders of the bonds or notes and to perform its duties under this chapter;

enforce all rights of the bondholders or noteholders, including the right to take possession and control of the business and properties of the Authority, to operate and maintain the same, to make any necessary repairs, renewals, and replacements to them, and to fix, revise, and collect fees and charges, so as to carry out any contract as to, or pledge of revenues, and to require the Authority to carry out and perform the terms of any contract with the holders of the bonds or notes or its duties under this chapter;

bring suit upon all or any part of the bonds or notes;

by action or suit, require the Authority to account as if it were the trustee of an express trust for the holders of the bonds or notes;

by action or suit, enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the holders of the bonds or notes;

declare all bonds or notes due and payable, and, if all defaults shall be made good, then with the consent of the holders of 25 percent of the principal amount of the bonds or notes then outstanding to annul the declaration and its consequences.

The trustee shall in addition to the foregoing have and possess all the powers necessary or appropriate for the exercise of any functions specifically set forth in this chapter or incident to the general representation of bondholders or noteholders in the enforcement and protection of their rights.

Before declaring the principal of bonds or notes due and payable, the trustee shall first give 30 days’ notice in writing to the Governor, to the Authority, and to the Attorney General of the State.

The Superior Court shall have jurisdiction of any suit, action, or proceeding by the trustee on behalf of bondholders or noteholders.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3.

§ 5035.
Pledge of the State.

The State does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of the notes and bonds issued under this chapter that the State will not limit or restrict the rights hereby vested in the Authority to perform its obligations and to fulfill the terms of any agreement made with the holders of its bonds or notes. Neither will the State in any way impair the rights and remedies of the holders until the notes and bonds, together with interest on them, and interest on any unpaid installments of interest, are fully met, paid, and discharged.
The Authority is authorized to execute this pledge and agreement of the State in any agreement with the holders of the notes or bonds.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3.

§ 5036.
Credit of State and members of Authority not pledged.

Obligations issued under the provisions of this chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt or liability or obligation of the State or of any political subdivision of it or of any member of the Authority, nor shall it be deemed to constitute a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or of any political subdivision or of any member of the Authority, but shall be payable solely from the revenues or assets of the Authority.
Each obligation issued by the Authority shall contain on its face a statement to the effect that the Authority shall not be obligated to pay the same nor the interest on it except from the revenues or assets pledged for those purposes and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State or of any political subdivision of it or of any member of the Authority is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on these obligations.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3.

§ 5037.
Notes and bonds as legal investments.

Notwithstanding any other law, the State and all public officers, governmental units, and agencies of the State, all banks, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies, insurance associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business, all credit unions, and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, monies, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or notes issued under this chapter, and the bonds or notes are authorized security for any and all public deposits.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3.

§ 5038.
Annual reports; audit.

On or before the last day of January in each year, the Authority shall submit a report of its activities for the preceding calendar year to the Governor, the Public Utility Commission, and the General Assembly. Each report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering its operations during the year, and shall contain a full and complete statement of the Authority’s anticipated budget and operations for the ensuing year. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made under this subsection. The Authority shall cause an audit of its books and accounts to be made at least once in each year by certified public accountants; the cost shall be considered an expense of the Authority and copies shall be filed with the State Treasurer and the Public Utility Commission.

The Auditor of Accounts of the State and his or her duly authorized representatives may at any time examine the accounts and books of the Authority including its receipts, disbursements, contracts, sinking funds, investments, and any other matters relating to its financial statements.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3; amended

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 51.

§ 5039.
Liberal construction.

Neither this chapter nor anything contained in this chapter is or shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers which the Authority might otherwise have under any laws of this State, and this chapter is cumulative to any such powers.
This chapter does and shall be construed to provide a complete, additional, and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized by it and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3.

§ 5040.
Public Utility Commission jurisdiction.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Authority shall be subject to the regulatory jurisdiction of the Public Utility Commission, insofar as provided in this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3.

§ 5041.
Inconsistent provisions in other laws superseded.

Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any special act or any municipal charter, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 78

, § 3.